Massachusetts, session 194th, S1470.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby
amended by adding the following new section:
Section 70. There shall be a special commission to study the streamlining of municipal
licenses for businesses. The commission shall consist of the following members, the chairs of the
joint committee on Community Development and Small Businesses, who shall serve as co-
chairs; 1 member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker; 1 member of the
senate appointed by the senate president; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; the secretary
of housing and economic development or a designee; 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts
Municipal Association; 1 member appointed by the Retailers Association of Massachusetts; 1
member appointed by the Massachusetts chapter of the national federation of independent
businesses; and 1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Restaurant Association.
of 2

The commission shall hold at least three public hearings and shall solicit input from the
public, and businesses on the process of municipal licensing for businesses and ways to
streamline processes and procedures. The commission shall submit a report to the legislature on
its findings and any legislative recommendations to update the laws of the commonwealth by
March 1, 2027.
of 2